Nebraska, session 109, LB1086.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 85-2005, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
85-2005 (1) An applicant for community college gap assistance under the
community college gap assistance program shall demonstrate capacity to achieve
the following outcomes:
(a) The ability to be accepted to and complete an eligible program;
(b) The ability to be accepted into and complete a postsecondary
certificate, diploma, or degree program for credit;
(c) The ability to obtain full-time employment; and
(d) The ability to maintain full-time employment over time.
(2) The committee may grant community college gap assistance under the
community college gap assistance program to an applicant in any amount up to
the full amount of eligible costs.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the The committee
shall deny an application when the community college or other eligible
institution receiving the application determines that funding for the total
eligible cost as defined in section 85-2006 for an applicant's participation in
an eligible program is available from any other public or private funding
source. The committee shall not consider any benefit available to an applicant
pursuant to the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program Employment and
Training program administered by the State of Nebraska pursuant to 7 C.F.R.
273.7, as such regulation existed on January 1, 2026, when determining an
applicant's eligibility for community college gap assistance.
Sec. 2. Original section 85-2005, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is repealed.
Sec. 3. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed and
approved according to law.
-1-